Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.090

Violations—Misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or who willfully and knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the secretary of state, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing statements required by this chapter, whether or not such statement or report is verified, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2000 c 171 s 75; 1991 c 128 s 9.]